Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.210

Gender-neutral terms.

(1) All statutes, memorials, and resolutions enacted, adopted, or amended by the legislature after July 1, 1983, shall be written in gender-neutral terms unless a specification of gender is intended.

(2) No statute, memorial, or resolution is invalid because it does not comply with this section.

[ 1983 c 20 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—1983 c 20: See note following RCW 43.01.160.

Number and gender in statutes: RCW 1.12.050.